apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
<dictionary>   
  <alphabet>ABCDEFGHILMNOPRSTUÀÈÌÒÙÁÉÓabcdefghilmnoprstuàèìòùáéó</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"      c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="det"    c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbcop"  c="Copula"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="def"    c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="ind"    c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"    c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="f"      c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="m"      c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="pl"     c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sg"     c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="sp"     c=""/>
    <sdef n="nom"    c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="dat"    c="Dative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"    c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="voc"    c="Vocative"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv" c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub" c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="top"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="ncn" c="Non-contrastive personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="con" c="Contrastive personal pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="str" c="Stressed Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="uns" c="Unstressed Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="nsi" c="No Stress Information"/>
    <sdef n="aff"    c="Affirmative"/>
    <sdef n="neg"    c="Negative"/>
    <sdef n="itg"    c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="impers"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="past"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pres"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="mon"/>
    <sdef n="iter"/>
    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="apos"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="l1"/>
    <sdef n="emph"/>    
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>     
    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e><p><l>-</l><r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>,</l><r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e><p><l>'</l><r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="ordinals">
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?mh</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="currency">
      <e><re>[£$€][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mon"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.\?;:!·]</re><p><l/><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="separ">
      <e><re>[¿¡]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l/><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l/><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- SECTION: Mutations -->      

    <pardef n="initial-b">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>b</l><r>b</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>bh</l><r>b</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>b</l><r>b</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-c">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>c</l><r>c</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ch</l><r>c</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>c</l><r>c</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-d">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>d</l><r>d</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>dh</l><r>d</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>d</l><r>d</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-f">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>f</l><r>f</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>fh</l><r>f</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>f</l><r>f</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-g">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>g</l><r>g</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>gh</l><r>g</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>g</l><r>g</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-l">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>l</l><r>l</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>l</l><r>l</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>l</l><r>l</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-m">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>m</l><r>m</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>mh</l><r>m</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>m</l><r>m</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-n">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l><r>n</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>n</l><r>n</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l><r>n</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-p">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>p</l><r>p</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ph</l><r>p</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>p</l><r>p</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-r'">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r'</l><r>r'</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>r</l><r>r'</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>r'</l><r>r'</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-s">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>s</l><r>s</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sh</l><r>s</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>s</l><r>s</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-t">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l><r>t</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>th</l><r>t</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>t</l><r>t</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-B">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>B</l><r>B</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Bh</l><r>B</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>B</l><r>B</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-C">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>C</l><r>C</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Ch</l><r>C</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>C</l><r>C</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-D">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>D</l><r>D</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Dh</l><r>D</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>D</l><r>D</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-F">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>F</l><r>F</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Fh</l><r>F</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>F</l><r>F</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-G">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>G</l><r>G</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Gh</l><r>G</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>G</l><r>G</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-L">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>L</l><r>L</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>L</l><r>L</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>L</l><r>L</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-M">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>M</l><r>M</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Mh</l><r>M</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>M</l><r>M</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-N">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>N</l><r>N</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>N</l><r>N</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>N</l><r>N</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-P">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>P</l><r>P</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Ph</l><r>P</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>P</l><r>P</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-R'">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>R'</l><r>R'</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>R</l><r>R'</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>R'</l><r>R'</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-S">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>S</l><r>S</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Sh</l><r>S</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>S</l><r>S</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="initial-T">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>T</l><r>T</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>Th</l><r>T</r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>T</l><r>T</r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="mutations">
      <!-- Lenition -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l><s n="l1"/></l><r><s n="l1"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/><s n="l1"/></l><r><s n="l1"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      
    <pardef n="dithis__num">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="pers"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Conjunctions -->     
    <pardef n="agus__cnjcoo">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
      

    <e lm="mutations"><i/><par n="mutations"/></e>
    <e lm="oir"><i>oir</i><par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="sianar"><i>sianar</i><par n="dithis__num"/></e>
    <e lm="deichnear"><i>deichnear</i><par n="dithis__num"/></e>
    <e lm="beachdaireachd"><par n="initial-b"/><i>eachdaireachd</i><par n="rè__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boghadaireachd"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oghadaireachd</i><par n="rè__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buarach"><par n="initial-b"/><i>uara</i><par n="cana/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cladhach"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ladha</i><par n="crò/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="craos"><par n="initial-c"/><i>rao</i><par n="nò/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="còmhrag"><par n="initial-c"/><i>òmhra</i><par n="la/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deasbad"><par n="initial-d"/><i>easba</i><par n="mò/d__n"/></e>
    <e lm="do-lùbachd"><par n="initial-d"/><i>o-lùbachd</i><par n="rè__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dì-chreideamh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ì-chreide</i><par n="nè/amh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feursann"><par n="initial-f"/><i>eursa</i><par n="ra/nn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuachd"><par n="initial-f"/><i>uachd</i><par n="rè__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glas"><par n="initial-g"/><i>la</i><par n="gla/s__n"/></e>
    <e lm="grèim-mionaich"><par n="initial-g"/><i>rèim</i><par n="grèim/-mionaich__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leth-chas"><par n="initial-l"/><i>eth-ch</i><par n="c/as__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lot"><par n="initial-l"/><i>ot</i><par n="tap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meal-bhuc"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eal-bhu</i><par n="ba/c__n"/></e>
    <e lm="molldair"><par n="initial-m"/><i>olldair</i><par n="guin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mìlseag"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ìlse</i><par n="ite/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neo-fhèinealachd"><par n="initial-n"/><i>eo-fhèinealachd</i><par n="rè__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nìghneag"><par n="initial-n"/><i>ìghne</i><par n="ite/ag__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plannt"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lannt</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pulsar"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ulsa</i><par n="pò/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sloinneadh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>loinn</i><par n="lid/eadh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sù"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ù</i><par n="sù__n"/></e>
    <e lm="togalaiche"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ogalaiche</i><par n="at__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tèarmann"><par n="initial-t"/><i>èarma</i><par n="ana/nn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Bosnia"><par n="initial-B"/><i>osnia</i><par n="Libia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Bulgàiria"><par n="initial-B"/><i>ulgàiria</i><par n="Libia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ceilteach"><par n="initial-C"/><i>eilt</i><par n="f/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Crìosd"><par n="initial-C"/><i>rìosd</i><par n="gò__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Diciadain"><par n="initial-D"/><i>iciadain</i><par n="gò__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dimàirt"><par n="initial-D"/><i>imàirt</i><par n="gò__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Fionnlannach"><par n="initial-F"/><i>ionnlanna</i><par n="lao/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Freaslannach"><par n="initial-F"/><i>reaslanna</i><par n="lao/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Gearmailteach"><par n="initial-G"/><i>earmailt</i><par n="f/each__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Greugais"><par n="initial-G"/><i>reugais</i><par n="min__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Liosach"><par n="initial-L"/><i>iosa</i><par n="lao/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Lunnainn"><par n="initial-L"/><i>unnainn</i><par n="min__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Muire"><par n="initial-M"/><i>uire</i><par n="Máire__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Màltach"><par n="initial-M"/><i>àlta</i><par n="lao/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nirribhidh"><par n="initial-N"/><i>irribhidh</i><par n="rè__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Nollaig"><par n="initial-N"/><i>ollaig</i><par n="pit__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Piuthar"><par n="initial-P"/><i></i><par n="P/iuthar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pròstanach"><par n="initial-P"/><i>ròstana</i><par n="lao/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Simbabue"><par n="initial-S"/><i>imbabue</i><par n="Libia__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Sàbaid"><par n="initial-S"/><i>àbaid</i><par n="seic__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tibeatach"><par n="initial-T"/><i>ibeata</i><par n="lao/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Tòraidh"><par n="initial-T"/><i>òraidh</i><par n="guin__n"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
